


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                               Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets       Where should we send information about your advisors?   Email            Great! We've found some fantastic advisors who fit your needs.Who should we have them reach out to?   First and Last Name            The best way to choose an advisor is by actually speaking with them.What phone should they use to reach out to you?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   Choosing the Right Financial Advisor | SmartAsset.com                                                Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It      Choosing the Right Financial Advisor Your Details Done By Eric Rosenberg        By Eric Rosenberg | November 23, 2016  If you know you want a financial advisor, choosing the right one can be a challenge. There are so many different fee structures and specialties, knowing how to sort through your options is difficult. You trust your financial advisor with your money, so it is important to make the best possible decision.How to Choose a Financial AdvisorWhen you start your search for a financial advisor, you need to find someone whose skills matches your needs. That means you need to recognize what you are looking for before you start looking.Here are some common needs from financial advisors: Cash flow management Budgeting Retirement planning Investing Paying for children's education No financial advisor is perfect for every need, which is why it is so important to understand your needs before hiring anyone.How to Find a Financial AdvisorYour first step in choosing a financial advisor after examining your needs is to find potential advisors. You will want someone who is easy to reach, and ideally not too far from your home or office so it is easy to get to a meeting if needed.There are over 750,000 registered financial advisors in the United States. SmartAsset's financial advisor search tool can help you navigate to the best advisor for your needs. Answer questions about where you live, your plans for retirement, and other financial priorities. In just a few minutes, you'll be all set and SmartAsset will have an advisor contact you.Questions to Ask a Financial AdvisorOnce you have found a few advisors, you should interview them to decide who is the best fit for your needs. Here are some example questions to ask to make sure you end up with the right advisor.How many years of experience do you have as a professional financial advisor? Do you want someone new and inexperienced managing your money? It is best to find someone with plenty of experience. Advisors with a decade or more under their belt have seen multiple economic cycles and can better help you weather the storm.What is your strongest focus area in financial planning? Some advisors are experts in retirement. Others have expertise in estates and trusts. Others still are best suited to help you pay for your child's education. Some financial advisors focus on people who are self-employed. Be sure to choose someone who can help with what you need, not what someone else needs.What is your budgeting philosophy? Every family's budget is unique. Budgets can be very detailed or more general. Some advisors suggest living frugally to meet your goals, others take a more balanced approach. Find an advisor with a philosophy that matches yours.How are you compensated? Some financial advisors are “fee only.” This means that you pay your advisor a flat fee for their services. Many advisors charge based on the size of your portfolio. The worst situation is where advisors are paid a commission by mutual funds. In this case, a conflict of interest exists. The advisor is incentivized to put your money into those funds even if they are not the best for your needs.How much does it cost to work with you? After learning how they are paid, make sure you know how much you will pay. No one wants a giant surprise bill after your first meeting.Are you a fiduciary? Fiduciary means putting your needs first. Many financial advisors work as a fiduciary and have to put your needs first, even if it means they earn less money. However, many financial advisors are not fiduciaries, and can give you advice that is not in your best interest.Do you own the same investments you'll suggest to me? Do they put their money where their mouth is? Advisors who suggest one strategy to clients and use a different strategy for their own finances should be a big red flag.How have your client's portfolios performed? How did you handle their portfolios during the Great Recession in 2008? These questions get to the root of their performance. If the advisor does not readily share this information, they are probably hiding something that went wrong in the past.  Make Sure Your Financial Advisor is LicensedFinancial advisors are not allowed to give you specific investment advice unless they are licensed. The most common and important license for a financial advisor is the CFP, or Certified Financial Planner. CFPs are regulated and must take a course and pass a test proving their competence in financial topics.Series 7 and Series 63 licenses give finance professionals the ability to recommend and trade stocks, bonds, and other investments on your behalf. Make sure your financial advisor has successfully completed both of these exams and has an up-to-date license.Beware of Lofty PromisesIf an advisor makes promises that sound like something from the 2016 Presidential Campaign, proceed with caution. Promises to beat the market and outperform other advisors and funds are easier said than done. Further, no advisor can promise that they will beat the market.At the end of the day, many financial advisors have similar skills. They use comparable tools and reports to stay up-to-date on the markets and help find the best investments for you. If any advisor gives you a bad vibe, don't feel bad looking elsewhere.Choose an Advisor You Can TrustAfter you have met with a few advisors, it is time to make your decision. Asking about licenses, fees, and past performance is black and white. There are other parts of the decision that are a bit more subjective.Do you like the person? Do you trust them? Would you trust them with your daughter's education fund? Your retirement?If you have been able to limit your list down to your final few, it is time to trust your gut. It is important to have an advisor you like, trust, and enjoy interacting with. Your money is too important to put in the hands of someone you don't trust. Pick and advisor who feels like a partner who will stand beside you through your financial journey. If you do, you'll be on track for a great financial future.If you're ready to start, answer a few questions in SmartAsset's financial advisor selection tool and you'll be contacted by a few advisors in your area to choose from.      Do I Need a Financial Advisor?   Find a Financial Advisor in Your Neighborhood      1 How much house can I afford? 2 How much house can I afford and some more text? 3 How much house can I afford and some more text? 4 How much house can I afford? 5 How much house can I afford? 6 How much house can I afford? 7 How much house can I afford?              Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                               Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets       What email should advisors use to speak with you?   Email            What is your full name?   First and Last Name            What is your phone number?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   7 Mistakes People Make When Choosing a Financial Advisor | SmartAsset.com                                                  Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It      7 Mistakes People Make When Choosing a Financial Advisor Your Details Done By Eric Rosenberg        January 19, 2017  Choosing a financial advisor is a big decision. Unlike hiring a mechanic or hairstylist, financial advisors are usually long term relationships. They are also taking responsibility for your money. With your entire livelihood on the line, choosing the wrong advisor would be a big mistake. Avoid these 7 common blunders when choosing an advisor to ensure you are on track to meet your financial goals.1. Hiring the First Advisor You MeetDepending on where you live, you could have dozens of options for advisors. It is tempting to hire the closest advisor to home. Some people might just pick the first advisor in the yellow pages. This decision requires more time. Take the time to interview at least a few advisors before picking the best match for you.2. Choosing an Advisor with the Wrong SpecialtyAdvisors can have different focus area. Some specialize on retirement planning. Some are best for business owners or those with a high net worth. Others are best for young professionals starting a family. This type of focus does not make an advisor better or worse. It makes them better for certain people than others. Be sure to understand an advisor’s strengths and weaknesses. Do that before signing on the dotted line.3. Picking an Advisor with an Incompatible StrategyEach advisor has a unique strategy. Some advisors may suggest aggressive investments. Others are more conservative. Again, there is no right or wrong. However, there is a right and wrong for you. If you don’t feel comfortable with risk, don’t choose an advisor that prefers aggressive investments. If you prefer to go all in on stocks, an advisor that prefers bonds and index funds is not a great match for your style.4. Skipping Checking ReferencesMost advisors are happy to offer references to prospective clients. If you ask about references and they act nervous, that's a red flag! Quality advisors are happy to discuss past missteps and what they learned. This helps them keep from repeating the same mistake in the future. Calling references only takes a couple of minutes. It can help put you at ease when handing over the keys to your bank account.5. Not Asking about CredentialsTo give investment advice, financial advisors are required to pass a test. Ask your advisor about their licenses, tests, and credentials. This ensures they are qualified to meet your needs. Financial advisors tests include the Series 7 and Series 66 or Series 65. Some advisors go a step further and become a Certified Financial Planner, or CFP. Also ask where they went to school and what degree they earned. Some advisors have a finance degree from a top school. Others could have an English degree from a community college.6. Making Assumptions When They are Affiliated with a Reputable BrandAn advisor might appear qualified and professional due to an association with a major firm like J.P. Morgan or Morgan Stanley. However, that doesn’t make them a great advisor. Working with an advisor from a reputable firm is not a bad idea. It often leads to stability and better tools and information. However, they still have quite a bit of autonomy. Choose an advisor because they are the best fit, not because of their branding.7. Not Understanding How They are PaidThere are different payment models for financial advisors. Some are “fee only.” In this case, they charge a flat rate no matter what. Others charge a percentage of assets under management. Some advisors are paid by mutual funds. This is the worst situation for you. This is a serious conflict of interest. If the advisor earns more by ignoring your best interests, do not hire them.Do Your Research to Find the Perfect AdvisorChoosing a financial advisor is an important decision. It requires the best information available. Gathering information about financial advisors can be tough. That is why SmartAsset created a financial advisor match tool. Answering basic questions results in a list of local advisors to choose from. It doesn't matter if you need help with your finances or just want a second opinion. Find the perfect advisor for your needs today!        Do I Need a Financial Advisor?   Find a Financial Advisor in Your Neighborhood      1 How much house can I afford? 2 How much house can I afford and some more text? 3 How much house can I afford and some more text? 4 How much house can I afford? 5 How much house can I afford? 6 How much house can I afford? 7 How much house can I afford?              Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                             Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets      Is there anything else potential advisors should know about your needs?  (Feel free to answer 'no' if you've already provided enough information)            What email should advisors use to speak with you?   Email            What is your full name?   First and Last Name            What is your phone number?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                



Home - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)























































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)















 LEARN MORE




Blog

Preparing for Arrival

“Flight attendants prepare for arrival…”  Those were five of the sweetest words I’d ever… Read more

View All Blog Posts
Twitter
Tweets by @BDF_LLC



Why BDF

What. How. And most importantly - Why.
Certainly you should understand what we do and how we do it. But most of all, you should know why.

Read More

Wealth Watch

China’s A Shares an “A” Idea?

On June 20th, index provider MSCI announced big news.  They finally decided to include… Read more

View All Wealth Watch


News

BDF Named to 2017 Financial Times 300 Top Registered Investment Advisers
June 22, 2017 – Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC is pleased to announce it has been named… Read more


Market Turns Upside-Down as Go-Go Tech Stocks Join Slow-Mo Funds
Tech giants are complicating efforts to diversify portfolios. Chad Carlson comments in “Market Turns Upside-Down as Go-Go… Read more


BDF Named One of the Best Places to Work in Illinois for the 7th Year in a Row
Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC placed 4th in the small business category as one of the 2017 Best Places… Read more

View All News
























The BDF Team - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / Who We Are 





Who We AreOverview
History
People
Philanthropy
Professional Relationships






Who We Are 


Your team. You and your family come first.
Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF) is an independent private wealth management firm. We manage approximately $3 billion in assets for business owners, women, individuals and families, and institutions.
Objective
As independent advisors, we put you first, always. We provide personalized, objective advice to build and maintain a secure foundation of wealth for your family. Motivated by trust and transparency, we discuss our thinking and decisions with you all along the way. We are vested not only in the well-being of your wealth but also in the well-being of your family.
Team culture
Our unified and personalized approach to wealth management lies in our unique ability to leverage an expansive team of wealth managers and specialized experts to provide our clients with comprehensive solutions. With your goals as our guide and the assistance of a dedicated team of independent experts — Wealth Managers, CPAs, tax specialists, lawyers and insurance professionals, we are able to coordinate the development of an integrated strategy and a realistic road map to help you enjoy a full life.
Conflict free
As a Securities and Exchange Commission Registered Investment Advisor, we are legally responsible to act in your best interest and to avoid (and disclose if present) conflicts of interest. We take this responsibility very seriously.
Recognized
We are proud to be consistently recognized among the industry, including recently being named one of the top local independent advisers by Five Star Professionals as featured in Chicago magazine. (See Important Disclosure Information)
Listed below are some of our most recent accomplishments:
2017

Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Forbes America’s Top Women Advisors

2016

Forbes Top 100 Fastest Growing RIA
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine RIA ranking

2015

Forbes Top 100 Wealth Managers
Barron’s Top 100 Independent Advisors (Top 15)
Barron’s Top Advisor Rankings for CA (Top 8)
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine RIA Ranking (Top 30)
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
CNBC top 100 fee-only Wealth Management firms
The Wall Street Journal Women in Wealth Five Star Wealth Managers

2014

 Barron’s Top Independent Financial Advisors (Top 20)
Wealth & Money Management Awards: Most Unbiased Wealth Management Team – USA
Wealth & Money Management Awards: Most Established Investment Advisory Firm of the Year – CA
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 30)
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Investment News Best Practice Award for growth and productivity
Chicago Magazine Women in Wealth-Five Star Wealth Managers
CNBC Top 100 Fee-only Wealth Management firms

2013

Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 25)
Forbes Top 50 Wealth Managers
Forbes Fastest Growing Wealth Managers
InvestmentNews.com – Top Fee Only RIAs
InvestmentNews.com – RIA Ranking
Orange County Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Rep/WealthManagement.com – Top 100 RIAs
2012
Barron’s – Top 100 Independent Wealth Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 20)
Rep/WealthManagement.com – Top 100 RIAs
Barron’s Top 100 Independent Financial Advisors
Best of Newport Beach Award (Financial Consultant category)

2011

Financial Advisor Magazine – Top RIA Ranking
Registered Rep – Top 50 Wealth Management RIAs
AdvisorOne.com – Top Wealth Managers
Trusts and Estates – Top 50 Wealth Management RIAs
Orange County Business Journal – Best Places to Work

2010

Orange Coast Magazine – Top Scoring Wealth Managers
WealthManagerWeb.com – Top Wealth Managers
Investment Advisor – Top 100 Wealth Managers
Financial Advisor – Top RIA Rankings

2009

Wealth Manager – Top 50 Women in Wealth Management
Registered Rep – America’s Top 100 RIA’s
Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers
Orange Coast Magazine – Best Personal Wealth Managers in the OC Area

2008

 Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers
Registered Rep – America’s Top 100 RIA’s
Forbes – Top 10 Most Dependable Wealth Managers (Goldline Research selection, So. Cal.)

2007

Financial Advisors – Top RIA Firms Ranked by Asset Growth

2006

Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers Superstars

 2005

Bloomberg Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers

 























Join Our Team - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / Join Our Team 





Join Our TeamOverview
Open Positions
Benefits






Join Our Team 


Our culture. To attract and retain top talent.
Joining Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF) means joining a team of people who are inspired and guided by the BDF mission of helping people make sound decisions to enjoy a full life. This mission is not only about helping our clients: it’s also about helping our team.
Professionally, we are motivated by our vision of working to be the best version of ourselves. Mentoring and training opportunities help us celebrate and build upon our strengths.
Personally, we value and respect our team members’ commitment to their families and passions as part of enjoying a full life.
Vision and values
The vision of our firm is equally important. Our vision is to set the standard of unmatched excellence by attracting and retaining top talent in order to passionately serve our clients, through a culture of growth and safety, anchored by our core values. The core values of our firm are the foundation of our decision-making:
• Always do the right thing
• Share a passion for excellence
• Demonstrate a positive attitude in all that we do
• Genuinely care for others
• Live a team culture
Recognize and reward
BDF, a six-year Best Places to Work award winner, offers:
• A generous benefits package, including a 401k plan and incentive-based compensation
• Fun team building events including family outings, holiday parties, casual jeans days, sports days, team breakfasts, team lunches, and monthly cocktail hours
• Friday summer hours
• Team awards
• Career growth
Being a BDF team member is more than just a job: it’s a calling. If you share our calling to help serve clients and team members, we would love to hear from you.
“What keeps me up at night is whether we are creating the environment for people to be at their best. Growth is all about our people. It’s about attracting and retaining top talent.”  Armond Dinverno























Blog - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)


















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / How We Think / Blog 





On the Horizon
All Charitable Giving College Planning Insurance Planning Investment Management Retirement Planning Risk Management Tax Planning Trust and Estate Planning




Preparing for Arrival

July 18, 2017 





Business Owners – 10 Things Your Spouse Wants to Know

July 11, 2017July 11, 2017 





Social InSecurity?

July 4, 2017 





Working Wealthy – What’s My Number?

June 27, 2017 





I Want You: Hiring (And Managing) a Divorce Attorney

June 20, 2017 





“Repeal” and “Replace (At a Later Date)”

June 13, 2017 





Trump Tax Reform – What Are The Details?

May 30, 2017June 15, 2017 





Getting out of the Blocks

May 23, 2017June 15, 2017 





Does Your Estate Plan Pass This Quick Checkup?

May 16, 2017May 16, 2017 





You May Be ABLE to Take Advantage of This Investment Account

May 9, 2017May 31, 2017 





Working Wealthy – Can I Spend My Own Money?

April 25, 2017May 10, 2017 





Divorce 101: Understanding the “Language” of Divorce

April 18, 2017April 20, 2017 






















Business Owners - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / Who We Serve / Business Owners 





Who We ServeOverview
Business Owners

Family Businesses
Founders


Women

Death of a Spouse
Professional Women


Divorcing Individuals
Individuals and Families
Institutions






Business Owners 




Expertise. To balance the personal and business.
It is our business to know your business. We can create a comprehensive wealth management plan that incorporates all aspects of your life. Business owners’ personal and professional lives are intertwined, and a solid wealth management plan must reflect those ties.
A business lens
At Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF), we take you through a customized assessment to identify and address any questions related to business operations, succession planning and family involvement that may become issues. We look at your entire financial picture through a business lens, making sure your wealth management plan reflects all aspects of your personal and professional lives and that you have the best experts on board to help you get the most from your business — and your life.
Shared experiences
Every day we talk with business owners about how what is happening in their business affects their lives. As business owners ourselves, we live these realities, allowing us to remain uniquely poised to help business owners achieve preparedness, clarity, and financial security. You will always have a confidant on your side.






Business Owners – 10 Things Your Spouse Wants to Know




























Wealth Manager - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)





















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / Wealth Manager 








Wealth Manager 

Wealth Manager Job Opening
Do you want to be a part of a great business with a culture that puts the client’s interest and team first? Are you motivated by being recognized as a best managed firm in the industry? Are you willing to challenge yourself, be challenged, and work with a team that sees the sky as the only limit?
BDF is a fee-only, independent private wealth management firm with offices in Itasca and Chicago, Illinois.  BDF specializes in working with business owners, women, individuals and families, and institutions. We are honored to have in excess of $3 billion in assets under management and a 98% client retention rate. BDF continues to grow and expand with our team and our clients’ best interest at heart. We have an immediate opening for a highly motivated, seasoned Wealth Manager in the Chicago area. Responsibilities and requirements for this professional position include demonstrated experience and knowledge of financial planning, investments, and client relationship management.
Only apply if these statements are important to you: always do the right thing, share a passion for excellence, demonstrate a positive attitude, genuinely care for others, and live a team culture. The BDF culture respects and rewards these behaviors.
Rewards and recognition are both at an individual and a team level. Two years from now, we will look back and be inspired by how you helped move the firm forward.
Click here to apply
We are proud to be among Forbes’ Top 50 Wealth Managers and to have been named one of the “Best Places to Work” in Illinois by the Daily Herald Business Ledger for 6 years in a row. We look forward to hearing from you!


















﻿

























Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC Sells 1,087 Shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Caterpillar Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Caterpillar Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Universal Health Services, Inc. (NYSE:UHS) Lifted to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research
Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Lowers Stake in Ashford Hospitality Trust Inc (NYSE:AHT)
U.S. Bancorp (NYSE:USB) Rating Increased to Buy at BidaskClub
Titan Machinery Inc. (NASDAQ:TITN) Position Decreased by Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC
Credit Suisse Group Initiates Coverage on Two Harbors Investments Corp (NYSE:TWO)
CryoLife, Inc. (NYSE:CRY) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.
Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Sells 107,096 Shares of Barnes & Noble, Inc. (NYSE:BKS)
Vantiv, Inc. (NYSE:VNTV) Price Target Cut to $64.00
Wabco Holdings Inc. (NYSE:WBC) Raised to Strong-Buy at BidaskClub
Comparing Stryker Corporation (SYK) and Endologix (NASDAQ:ELGX)
Analyzing Grupo Aeroportuario Del Pacifico, S.A. de C.V. (NYSE:PAC) and Macquarie Infrastructure (MIC)
Omnia Family Wealth LLC Holds Position in Mastercard Incorporated (NYSE:MA)
Positive News Coverage Likely to Impact MDU Resources Group (NYSE:MDU) Share Price
Heat Biologics, Inc. (NASDAQ:HTBX) Expected to Post Earnings of -$0.10 Per Share
Analyzing Dow Chemical Company (The) (NYSE:DOW) & FMC Corporation (FMC)
United Parcel Service, Inc. (NYSE:UPS) Stake Reduced by Essex Financial Services Inc.
Mason Street Advisors LLC Sells 112 Shares of Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW)
Southern Company (The) (NYSE:SO) Stake Cut by Palladium Partners LLC
Duke Energy Corporation (NYSE:DUK) Position Boosted by Assetmark Inc.
The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Position Boosted by Tiedemann Wealth Management LLC


 


Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC Sells 1,087 Shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 

Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC reduced its position in Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) by 22.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor owned 3,693 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after selling 1,087 shares during the period. Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC’s holdings in Caterpillar were worth $343,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other hedge funds have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Northstar Group Inc. increased its stake in Caterpillar by 0.3% in the first quarter. Northstar Group Inc. now owns 2,377 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $219,000 after buying an additional 8 shares in the last quarter. Bingham Osborn & Scarborough LLC increased its stake in Caterpillar by 0.4% in the fourth quarter. Bingham Osborn & Scarborough LLC now owns 2,303 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $214,000 after buying an additional 9 shares in the last quarter. Trust Investment Advisors raised its position in Caterpillar by 0.3% in the first quarter. Trust Investment Advisors now owns 16,080 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $1,492,000 after buying an additional 50 shares during the last quarter. Diversified Trust Co raised its position in Caterpillar by 1.9% in the first quarter. Diversified Trust Co now owns 2,777 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $258,000 after buying an additional 53 shares during the last quarter. Finally, Financial Architects Inc raised its position in Caterpillar by 5.7% in the first quarter. Financial Architects Inc now owns 1,215 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $113,000 after buying an additional 65 shares during the last quarter. 70.70% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Caterpillar Inc. alerts:



Shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) opened at 107.07 on Wednesday. The company’s market capitalization is $63.07 billion. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $106.20 and a 200-day moving average price of $98.93. Caterpillar, Inc. has a 12 month low of $78.34 and a 12 month high of $110.00. Caterpillar also was the recipient of some unusual options trading activity on Monday. Investors bought 37,848 call options on the stock. This represents an increase of approximately 377% compared to the average daily volume of 7,942 call options.




Caterpillar (NYSE:CAT) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Tuesday, April 25th. The industrial products company reported $1.28 EPS for the quarter, beating the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.62 by $0.66. Caterpillar had a negative net margin of 0.38% and a positive return on equity of 16.46%. The firm had revenue of $9.82 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $9.27 billion. During the same quarter last year, the business earned $0.67 earnings per share. The business’s revenue for the quarter was up 3.8% compared to the same quarter last year. Analysts forecast that Caterpillar, Inc. will post $4.25 EPS for the current year. 
The business also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Saturday, August 19th. Investors of record on Thursday, July 20th will be paid a $0.78 dividend. This is a boost from Caterpillar’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.77. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Tuesday, July 18th. This represents a $3.12 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 2.91%. Caterpillar’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is -1,140.70%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: This report was reported by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are viewing this report on another domain, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of United States & international copyright & trademark legislation. The correct version of this report can be viewed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/19/balasa-dinverno-foltz-llc-reduces-position-in-caterpillar-inc-cat-updated-updated.html. 
A number of research firms have recently commented on CAT. Axiom Securities reaffirmed a “sell” rating on shares of Caterpillar in a report on Thursday, July 13th. Zacks Investment Research raised Caterpillar from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $121.00 price target for the company in a report on Friday, July 14th. BidaskClub raised Caterpillar from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research note on Saturday, July 1st. Bank of America Corporation set a $120.00 price objective on Caterpillar and gave the company a “buy” rating in a research note on Tuesday, June 20th. Finally, BMO Capital Markets reissued a “hold” rating and set a $110.00 price objective on shares of Caterpillar in a research note on Wednesday, June 21st. Two analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, thirteen have assigned a hold rating, eleven have issued a buy rating and one has issued a strong buy rating to the company. The company has an average rating of “Hold” and an average target price of $97.72.
Caterpillar Company Profile
 

 
Receive News & Ratings for Caterpillar Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Caterpillar Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 
































	
       Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC
    





























































































Loading…









Client Login 



 







The content you are accessing is secure and will require a user login. Please enter your User ID and Password and click "Login".

Click here to return to the Main Site.



 









Loading…












   Navigation
Main Site
Terms Of Use
Important DisclosureInformation



  Contact
  Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)
  500 Park Boulevard
  Suite 1400
  Itasca, IL 60143
Map It

  Local
630.875.4900


   
   
  125 South Wacker Drive
  Suite 311
  Chicago, IL 60606
Map It

  Toll Free
800.840.4740





LinkedIn





  © 2015 BDF LLC  |  Terms of Use  |  Important Disclosure Information










Loading…








Loading…












 














 











Username
























 











Password
























 























 



Forgot Password?












Loading…





	 




Loading…
















BBB Business Profile | Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC | Accreditation




























Home
 > 
Business Directory
 > 
Financial Services
 > 
Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC














This Business Is Not BBB Accredited



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC



Submit a Review

































Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC






            Business Information
        






(630) 875-4900

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC
6 years in business

        500 Park Boulevard, Suite 1400
        Itasca, IL 60143-1272
    




                 WEBSITE
            





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 02/28/2011
            

                Business Started: 01/01/2011


                Business Started Locally: 01/01/2011
            





            Business Management
        


                    Ms. Susan Korin, Manager
                

                    Mark Balasa
                






            Business Category
        


                Financial Services
            




                            NAICS: Investment Advice
                        




See More Business Categories
See Less Business Categories












                    Number of Employees: 
                
                34
            



See Less Business Information
See More Business Information


 







BBB Accreditation





                This Business Is Not BBB Accredited
            

                
                Businesses are under no obligation to seek BBB accreditation, and some businesses are not accredited because they have not sought BBB accreditation.
            

                To be accredited by BBB, a business must apply for accreditation and BBB must determine that the business meets
                BBB accreditation standards, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses must pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        






This Business Is Not BBB Accredited  

                Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC
            










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    



                        This business has no complaints filed
                    









Composite Score:





                        Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC has received 0 out of 5 stars based on 0 Customer Reviews and a BBB Rating of A+.
                        






                            Comprised of 67% BBB Rating and 33% Customer Review Rating.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business. The Customer Review
                            Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive, neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                        

                            The BBB letter grade represents the BBB's opinion of how the business is likely to interact with its customers.
                            The BBB grade is based on BBB file information about the business.
                            In some cases, a business' grade may be lowered if the BBB does not have sufficient
                            information about the business despite BBB's requests for that information from the business.
                        

                            The BBB Customer Review Rating plus the BBB Rating is not a guarantee of a business'
                            reliability or performance. BBB recommends that consumers consider a business'
                            BBB Rating and Customer Review Rating in addition to all other available information
                            about the business.
                        














Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint












Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 






































 


















BBB Chicago & Northern Illinois



























 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











News




07/12/17


Better Business Bureau Advisory: Storm Chasers



07/10/17


Buyer “and” Seller Beware – BBB Warns of the Dangers with Online Sales



07/05/17


This is Why BBB Launched New Cyber Crime Initiative to Combat Growing Attacks on Businesses



06/29/17


BBB Advises Independence Day Enthusiasts to Exercise Caution  this 4th of July Holiday Weekend



 More Local News »


















File a Complaint
GO NOW »







Submit a Review
Submit »







 Local Sponsors








Phoenix Home Construction, Inc.














 









MORE »


BBB Military Line®

Consumer education and advocacy for Active Duty, National Guard, Reserve, DoD Civilians, Retirees and their families.




 
















































BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.






















































BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.

















































Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc in Itasca, IL 60143 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Illinois
» Itasca
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc













Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





500 Park Blvd Ste 1400 Itasca, Illinois 60143


(847) 925-9400
Website


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc is located at the address 500 Park Blvd in Itasca, Illinois 60143.  They can be contacted via phone at (847) 925-9400 for pricing, hours and directions.  Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc has an annual sales volume of 1M – 1,999,999.  .For more information contact Matthew  Mikula, Wealth Manager or  go to www.mybdf.comBalasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc provides Wealth Management, College Funding, Investment Services to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc view the map to the right.  For reviews of Balasa Dinverno Foltz  Llc see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Annuities
, Mutual Funds
, Family Policies
, Employee Benefits
, Tax Free Investments
, Mortgage Investments
, Rollover Plans
, Industrial Policies
, Employer-Sponsored Pensions
, Commodities



SERVICES


Investments
, College Funding
, Cash Management
, Online Services
, Banking
, Brokerage Services
, Financial Services
, Investment Services
, Wealth Management
, Corporate Services



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (847) 925-9400
Website: www.mybdf.com
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 20 To 49
Exact Employee Count: 35
Exact Sales Volume: 1100000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 1M – 1,999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Finance
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


Bnsb Investment


401 W Pierce Rd  Itasca, Illinois 60143




Home Trust Cto Cl


549 Home Ave  Itasca, Illinois 60143




Zulauf Financial Svc


900 N Arlngtn Hgts rd 3  Itasca, Illinois 60143





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




Matthew  Mikula
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Matthew  Reznik
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Michael Craig Foltz
PRINCIPAL
Phone: (630) 875-4900 
 



Amy  Craig
HEAD TRADER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Heather L Ocus
PRINCIPAL
Phone: (630) 875-4900 
 



Jen  Lake
Member of Women Service Team
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Chris  Rachford
CLERK/CLERICAL/RECEPTIONIST
Phone: (630) 875-4914 
 



Armond Alfred Dinverno
HR DIRECTOR
Phone: (630) 875-4900 
 



Charles  Neff
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



John  Smith
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Chad  Carlson
SENIOR ADVISOR
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Dan  Harris
SENIOR ADVISORS
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Mark Edward Balasa
SECRETARY
Phone: (630) 875-4900 
 



Michael  Walther
CHARTERED FINANCIAL ANALYST
Phone: (630) 875-4927 
 



Tom  Collar

Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Jan  Mortensen
EVENTS COORDINATOR
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Jim  King
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



Julie  Bucaro
WEALTH MANAGER
Phone: (847) 925-9400 
 



View More
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM














The BDF Team - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






















































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)






Home / Who We Are 





Who We AreOverview
History
People
Philanthropy
Professional Relationships






Who We Are 


Your team. You and your family come first.
Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF) is an independent private wealth management firm. We manage approximately $3 billion in assets for business owners, women, individuals and families, and institutions.
Objective
As independent advisors, we put you first, always. We provide personalized, objective advice to build and maintain a secure foundation of wealth for your family. Motivated by trust and transparency, we discuss our thinking and decisions with you all along the way. We are vested not only in the well-being of your wealth but also in the well-being of your family.
Team culture
Our unified and personalized approach to wealth management lies in our unique ability to leverage an expansive team of wealth managers and specialized experts to provide our clients with comprehensive solutions. With your goals as our guide and the assistance of a dedicated team of independent experts — Wealth Managers, CPAs, tax specialists, lawyers and insurance professionals, we are able to coordinate the development of an integrated strategy and a realistic road map to help you enjoy a full life.
Conflict free
As a Securities and Exchange Commission Registered Investment Advisor, we are legally responsible to act in your best interest and to avoid (and disclose if present) conflicts of interest. We take this responsibility very seriously.
Recognized
We are proud to be consistently recognized among the industry, including recently being named one of the top local independent advisers by Five Star Professionals as featured in Chicago magazine. (See Important Disclosure Information)
Listed below are some of our most recent accomplishments:
2017

Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Forbes America’s Top Women Advisors

2016

Forbes Top 100 Fastest Growing RIA
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine RIA ranking

2015

Forbes Top 100 Wealth Managers
Barron’s Top 100 Independent Advisors (Top 15)
Barron’s Top Advisor Rankings for CA (Top 8)
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine RIA Ranking (Top 30)
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
CNBC top 100 fee-only Wealth Management firms
The Wall Street Journal Women in Wealth Five Star Wealth Managers

2014

 Barron’s Top Independent Financial Advisors (Top 20)
Wealth & Money Management Awards: Most Unbiased Wealth Management Team – USA
Wealth & Money Management Awards: Most Established Investment Advisory Firm of the Year – CA
Chicago Magazine Five Star Wealth Managers
Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 30)
Financial Times Top 300 Registered Investment Advisors
Investment News Best Practice Award for growth and productivity
Chicago Magazine Women in Wealth-Five Star Wealth Managers
CNBC Top 100 Fee-only Wealth Management firms

2013

Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 25)
Forbes Top 50 Wealth Managers
Forbes Fastest Growing Wealth Managers
InvestmentNews.com – Top Fee Only RIAs
InvestmentNews.com – RIA Ranking
Orange County Business Journal – Best Places to Work
Rep/WealthManagement.com – Top 100 RIAs
2012
Barron’s – Top 100 Independent Wealth Advisors
Financial Advisor Magazine – RIA Ranking (Top 20)
Rep/WealthManagement.com – Top 100 RIAs
Barron’s Top 100 Independent Financial Advisors
Best of Newport Beach Award (Financial Consultant category)

2011

Financial Advisor Magazine – Top RIA Ranking
Registered Rep – Top 50 Wealth Management RIAs
AdvisorOne.com – Top Wealth Managers
Trusts and Estates – Top 50 Wealth Management RIAs
Orange County Business Journal – Best Places to Work

2010

Orange Coast Magazine – Top Scoring Wealth Managers
WealthManagerWeb.com – Top Wealth Managers
Investment Advisor – Top 100 Wealth Managers
Financial Advisor – Top RIA Rankings

2009

Wealth Manager – Top 50 Women in Wealth Management
Registered Rep – America’s Top 100 RIA’s
Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers
Orange Coast Magazine – Best Personal Wealth Managers in the OC Area

2008

 Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers
Registered Rep – America’s Top 100 RIA’s
Forbes – Top 10 Most Dependable Wealth Managers (Goldline Research selection, So. Cal.)

2007

Financial Advisors – Top RIA Firms Ranked by Asset Growth

2006

Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers Superstars

 2005

Bloomberg Wealth Manager – Top Wealth Managers

 





















Balasa Dinverno Foltz, LLC                                                                                               - Itasca                                            , IL         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IL



Itasca



Trusts, Nec



Private Estate, Personal Investment And Vacation Fund Trusts



                            Balasa Dinverno Foltz, LLC
                                    



 





















B 


Balasa Dinverno Foltz, LLC                                                                                              
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



500 PARK BLVD STE 1400 ITASCA, IL 60143
Get Directions



(630) 875-4900
www.bdfllc.com                                                                                          





Business Info



 Founded 1986
 Incorporated IL
 Annual Revenue $2,322,869.00
 Employee Count 20
 Industries Private Estate, Personal Investment And Vacation Fund Trusts
 Contacts Mark Balasa                                                                                                             







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Balasa Dinverno Foltz, Llc                                                                                               was founded in 1986, and is located at 500 Park Blvd Ste 1400 in Itasca. Additional information is available at www.bdfllc.com                                                                                           or by contacting Mark Balasa                                                                                                              at (630) 875-4900. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















































































Research Hub




Sign In











Sign In


New Account



About Macroaxis


Settings


Plans & Pricing



 Toggle Menu


 Toggle Fullscreen







   Markets




Equities




Portfolios




Stories






×











 My Equities
Investing Ideas

Free Tools

World Markets Map
Cryptocurrency Center
Equity Research
Company Directory
Insider Directory
Buy or Sell Recommendation
Pair Correlation
Stocks Correlation
Pattern Recognition
Watchlist Analysis



 Services

Technology Overview
Solution Methodology
Acknowledgement
Product Tour
FAQs



 About Us

About Macroaxis
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
Advertising



Sign In   DOW   21,580  0.15%Charles ChaoXin ZhouJianjun Zang






World
US















Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC

  
		


 
		




Companies in United States
Insiders
Advisers
Ideas
Correlations
Volatility
News
Funds
ETFs
Crypto










	Upgrade to remove ads 





User TypeAdvisorEntity NameBalasa Dinverno & Foltz LLCSEC Registration # Minimum Invetsment Required0.0Assets Under Managment$ 1.47 B Contact Details LocationItasca, IllinoisAddress Postal Code CountryUnited StatesPhone Fax Web Sitehttp://www.bdfllc.com




Sign In
	
				 to check out null and other financial advisors in the area. 							
		
				 As a registered user you will also get following benefit from Macroaxis membership: 							
					
				





							
								 Best Portfolio Management and Performance Monitoring Solution on Internet.
								









								 Easy to use Portfolio Optimization Tools which money managers have used for years.
								









								 Know your risk and identify high risk, low return stocks in your portfolio.
								







Get Started With Macroaxis




You May Also Consider Name Location  Net Rating  Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC Itasca IL 0 Summit Wealth Advisors LLC Itasca IL 0 Waterstone Financial Group  Inc. Itasca IL 0 Strategic Financial Advisory Servic Itasca IL 0 Winslow Financial LLC Lake Forest IL 0 Wellspring Capital Advisors  LLC Chicago IL 0 Optimum Investment Advisors  LLC Chicago IL 0 Chicago Growth Partners  LLC Chicago IL 0 Serious Stewardship  LLC Lake Forest IL 0 Sanborn Kilcollin Partners  LLC Chicago IL 0


Financial advisors use their knowledge of investments, 
tax laws, and insurance to recommend financial options to individuals.
The SEC typically regulates investment advisers that have assets under management in excess of $25,000,000. Investment advisers that do not meet this threshold generally are regulated by the states. The SEC registers IA firms but does not separately register individual representatives of IA firms. The states register IA firms, and many separately register individual investment adviser representatives.

Currently, you can only search for IA firms on this website. In the future, this website also will provide the ability to search for individual investment adviser representatives.

In 1996 Congress amended the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 to require that the SEC establish a readily accessible electronic process to respond to public inquiries about investment advisers and their disciplinary information. The SEC created this website to satisfy Congress? mandate. 


		Refer to the following references to for additional information before selecting your Financial Advisor
			
IARD    Investment Adviser Registration Depository
Investment Adviser Search    Search for an Investment Adviser Firm
U.S. Department of Labor: Financial Advisors    Bureau of Labor Statistics: Financial Advisors
FINRA    Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
AAFM    American Academy of Financial Management
CFP    Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards
FPA    Financial Planning Association









OpportunitiesExplore Investment OpportunitiesBuild portfolios using Macroaxis predefined set of investing ideas. Many of Macroaxis investing ideas can easily outperform a given market. Ideas can also be optimized per your risk profile before portfolio origination is invoked. Explore Investing Ideas  Fix All your PortfoliosBy capturing your risk tolerance and investment horizon Macroaxis technology of instant portfolio optimization will compute exactly how much risk is acceptable for your desired return expectationsFix your portfolios for free








Updating Transaction...
	






	Report was successfully generated
	



































































































			© 2017 Macroaxis LLC All rights reserved  
		








Insiders
Companies
Contact Us
Feedback
Widgets







































Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC Company Profile | Financial Information, Competitors and ExecutivesCATEGORIESCITIESSign InFind Companies > Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLCBBalasa Dinverno Foltz LLCEDITLocationItasca, ILRevenue$6mTotal Funding$–Founded1986Employees40StageprivateCompany Websitebdfllc.com/LinkedInlinkedin.com/Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLCBDF is an independent private wealth management firm. We manage approximately $3
billion in assets for business owners, women, individuals and families, and
institutions.Keywordscareer change,sale of business,divorce,succession planning,growth of businessBalasa Dinverno Foltz LLC CompetitorsWarren Averett, LLCDiscover the variety of planning and management services offered to...BBKD CPAs & AdvisorsAre you searching for a CPA, accountant or financial accounting...AAmerican Realty AdvisorsWith over $7.4 billion in assets under management, American Realty...See 2 more with a free trialRecent News from Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLCStart trial to view recent news about Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC.Request trialBusiness Data in your WorkflowSave time and work smarter with fresh data on companies, leads, and contactsLearn about DataFox APIs and Data324 5th Street 
San Francisco, CA 94107 (415) 969-2144info@datafox.comLinkedInTwitterDataFoxProductWho Benefits?CustomersCompanyBlogLearn MoreAccount-based MarketingSales Prospecting TipsSales Operations StrategyFastest-Growing Tech Companies By RegionTourSalesforce IntegrationSlack IntegrationChrome ExtensionDataFox APISupportEmail UsHelp CenterPrivacy PolicyTerms of Service﻿

























The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Position Raised by Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for The Kraft Heinz Company
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor The Kraft Heinz Company with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

TRI Pointe Group, Inc. (TPH) Downgraded by Barclays PLC to “Equal Weight”
Tesoro Corporation (TSO) Upgraded to Strong-Buy at BidaskClub
AeroVironment, Inc. (NASDAQ:AVAV) Posts Quarterly Earnings Results, Beats Estimates By $0.31 EPS
BT Group plc (BT.A) Research Coverage Started at Numis Securities Ltd
Robert Walters PLC (RWA) Raised to “Buy” at Numis Securities Ltd
Pivotal Research Reiterates “Sell” Rating for Snap Inc. (SNAP)
Hasbro, Inc. (HAS) Expected to Announce Earnings of $0.45 Per Share
Trustmark Corporation (TRMK) Stake Increased by AQR Capital Management LLC
WidePoint (NYSEMKT:WYY) Earning Favorable Press Coverage, Analysis Shows
Analysts Set Expectations for Endo International PLC’s FY2017 Earnings (NASDAQ:ENDP)
Viavi Solutions (NASDAQ:VIAV) Getting Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Study Shows
BlueCrest Capital Management Ltd Takes Position in Zoetis Inc. (NYSE:ZTS)
Kroger Company (The) (KR) Shares Sold by Sii Investments Inc. WI
1-800 FLOWERS.COM, Inc. (NASDAQ:FLWS) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $249.89 Million
$110.40 Million in Sales Expected for United Community Banks, Inc. (NASDAQ:UCBI) This Quarter
Brokerages Anticipate Horizon Technology Finance Corporation (NASDAQ:HRZN) Will Post Quarterly Sales of $6.81 Million
Head-To-Head Survey: Holly Energy Partners, L.P. (HEP) and Nustar Energy L.P. (NYSE:NS)
Critical Comparison: Civitas Solutions (CIVI) and Brookdale Senior Living (NYSE:BKD)
CTS Corporation (CTS) versus Maxwell Technologies (NASDAQ:MXWL) Financial Analysis
Luminex Corporation (NASDAQ:LMNX) Cut to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research


 


The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Position Raised by Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 

Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC boosted its position in The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) by 2.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor owned 2,539 shares of the company’s stock after buying an additional 70 shares during the period. Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC’s holdings in The Kraft Heinz were worth $231,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
A number of other hedge funds have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Bollard Group LLC raised its position in The Kraft Heinz by 0.7% in the first quarter. Bollard Group LLC now owns 1,149 shares of the company’s stock worth $104,000 after buying an additional 8 shares during the last quarter. Fisher Asset Management LLC raised its stake in The Kraft Heinz by 0.3% in the first quarter. Fisher Asset Management LLC now owns 2,889 shares of the company’s stock valued at $262,000 after buying an additional 8 shares in the last quarter. Gratus Capital LLC raised its stake in The Kraft Heinz by 0.3% in the fourth quarter. Gratus Capital LLC now owns 5,120 shares of the company’s stock valued at $447,000 after buying an additional 16 shares in the last quarter. Cobblestone Capital Advisors LLC NY raised its stake in The Kraft Heinz by 0.6% in the first quarter. Cobblestone Capital Advisors LLC NY now owns 3,369 shares of the company’s stock valued at $306,000 after buying an additional 21 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC raised its stake in The Kraft Heinz by 0.8% in the first quarter. Kistler Tiffany Companies LLC now owns 3,003 shares of the company’s stock valued at $273,000 after buying an additional 25 shares in the last quarter. 61.95% of the stock is owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get The Kraft Heinz Company alerts:



Shares of The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) opened at 85.60 on Wednesday. The company has a market capitalization of $104.23 billion, a PE ratio of 30.46 and a beta of 0.44. The Kraft Heinz Company has a 12 month low of $79.69 and a 12 month high of $97.77. The stock has a 50 day moving average price of $88.55 and a 200-day moving average price of $89.91. 




The Kraft Heinz (NASDAQ:KHC) last released its earnings results on Wednesday, May 3rd. The company reported $0.84 EPS for the quarter, missing the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $0.85 by $0.01. The Kraft Heinz had a return on equity of 7.25% and a net margin of 13.12%. The firm had revenue of $6.36 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $6.44 billion. During the same quarter last year, the business posted $0.73 EPS. The firm’s revenue was down 3.1% on a year-over-year basis. Analysts forecast that The Kraft Heinz Company will post $3.24 EPS for the current year. 
WARNING: “The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Position Raised by Balasa Dinverno & Foltz LLC” was first published by BNB Daily and is the property of of BNB Daily. If you are accessing this report on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of US & international copyright & trademark legislation. The correct version of this report can be accessed at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/19/balasa-dinverno-foltz-llc-raises-stake-in-the-kraft-heinz-company-khc-updated-updated.html. 
Several equities research analysts recently issued reports on the company. Royal Bank Of Canada set a $96.00 price objective on The Kraft Heinz and gave the company a “buy” rating in a research note on Saturday, June 3rd. Consumer Edge raised The Kraft Heinz to an “overweight” rating in a research note on Thursday, May 4th. J P Morgan Chase & Co reaffirmed an “overweight” rating and set a $99.00 price target (down previously from $102.00) on shares of The Kraft Heinz in a research note on Wednesday, June 28th. Susquehanna Bancshares Inc reaffirmed a “neutral” rating and set a $91.00 price target (down previously from $99.00) on shares of The Kraft Heinz in a research note on Monday, July 10th. Finally, Piper Jaffray Companies initiated coverage on The Kraft Heinz in a research note on Wednesday, May 24th. They set a “neutral” rating and a $94.00 price target for the company. Two investment analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, six have issued a hold rating and eleven have assigned a buy rating to the stock. The Kraft Heinz has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $97.96.
The Kraft Heinz Company Profile
The Kraft Heinz Company is a food and beverage company. The Company is engaged in the manufacturing and marketing of food and beverage products, including condiments and sauces, cheese and dairy, meals, meats, refreshment beverages, coffee and other grocery products. The Company’s segments include the United States, Canada and Europe. 

 
Receive News & Ratings for The Kraft Heinz Company Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for The Kraft Heinz Company and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 

































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                               Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets       Where should we send information about your advisors?   Email            Great! We've found some fantastic advisors who fit your needs.Who should we have them reach out to?   First and Last Name            The best way to choose an advisor is by actually speaking with them.What phone should they use to reach out to you?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   Choosing the Right Financial Advisor | SmartAsset.com                                                  Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It      Choosing the Right Financial Advisor Your Details Done By Eric Rosenberg        By Eric Rosenberg | November 23, 2016  If you know you want a financial advisor, choosing the right one can be a challenge. There are so many different fee structures and specialties, knowing how to sort through your options is difficult. You trust your financial advisor with your money, so it is important to make the best possible decision.How to Choose a Financial AdvisorWhen you start your search for a financial advisor, you need to find someone whose skills matches your needs. That means you need to recognize what you are looking for before you start looking.Here are some common needs from financial advisors: Cash flow management Budgeting Retirement planning Investing Paying for children's education No financial advisor is perfect for every need, which is why it is so important to understand your needs before hiring anyone.How to Find a Financial AdvisorYour first step in choosing a financial advisor after examining your needs is to find potential advisors. You will want someone who is easy to reach, and ideally not too far from your home or office so it is easy to get to a meeting if needed.There are over 750,000 registered financial advisors in the United States. SmartAsset's financial advisor search tool can help you navigate to the best advisor for your needs. Answer questions about where you live, your plans for retirement, and other financial priorities. In just a few minutes, you'll be all set and SmartAsset will have an advisor contact you.Questions to Ask a Financial AdvisorOnce you have found a few advisors, you should interview them to decide who is the best fit for your needs. Here are some example questions to ask to make sure you end up with the right advisor.How many years of experience do you have as a professional financial advisor? Do you want someone new and inexperienced managing your money? It is best to find someone with plenty of experience. Advisors with a decade or more under their belt have seen multiple economic cycles and can better help you weather the storm.What is your strongest focus area in financial planning? Some advisors are experts in retirement. Others have expertise in estates and trusts. Others still are best suited to help you pay for your child's education. Some financial advisors focus on people who are self-employed. Be sure to choose someone who can help with what you need, not what someone else needs.What is your budgeting philosophy? Every family's budget is unique. Budgets can be very detailed or more general. Some advisors suggest living frugally to meet your goals, others take a more balanced approach. Find an advisor with a philosophy that matches yours.How are you compensated? Some financial advisors are “fee only.” This means that you pay your advisor a flat fee for their services. Many advisors charge based on the size of your portfolio. The worst situation is where advisors are paid a commission by mutual funds. In this case, a conflict of interest exists. The advisor is incentivized to put your money into those funds even if they are not the best for your needs.How much does it cost to work with you? After learning how they are paid, make sure you know how much you will pay. No one wants a giant surprise bill after your first meeting.Are you a fiduciary? Fiduciary means putting your needs first. Many financial advisors work as a fiduciary and have to put your needs first, even if it means they earn less money. However, many financial advisors are not fiduciaries, and can give you advice that is not in your best interest.Do you own the same investments you'll suggest to me? Do they put their money where their mouth is? Advisors who suggest one strategy to clients and use a different strategy for their own finances should be a big red flag.How have your client's portfolios performed? How did you handle their portfolios during the Great Recession in 2008? These questions get to the root of their performance. If the advisor does not readily share this information, they are probably hiding something that went wrong in the past.  Make Sure Your Financial Advisor is LicensedFinancial advisors are not allowed to give you specific investment advice unless they are licensed. The most common and important license for a financial advisor is the CFP, or Certified Financial Planner. CFPs are regulated and must take a course and pass a test proving their competence in financial topics.Series 7 and Series 63 licenses give finance professionals the ability to recommend and trade stocks, bonds, and other investments on your behalf. Make sure your financial advisor has successfully completed both of these exams and has an up-to-date license.Beware of Lofty PromisesIf an advisor makes promises that sound like something from the 2016 Presidential Campaign, proceed with caution. Promises to beat the market and outperform other advisors and funds are easier said than done. Further, no advisor can promise that they will beat the market.At the end of the day, many financial advisors have similar skills. They use comparable tools and reports to stay up-to-date on the markets and help find the best investments for you. If any advisor gives you a bad vibe, don't feel bad looking elsewhere.Choose an Advisor You Can TrustAfter you have met with a few advisors, it is time to make your decision. Asking about licenses, fees, and past performance is black and white. There are other parts of the decision that are a bit more subjective.Do you like the person? Do you trust them? Would you trust them with your daughter's education fund? Your retirement?If you have been able to limit your list down to your final few, it is time to trust your gut. It is important to have an advisor you like, trust, and enjoy interacting with. Your money is too important to put in the hands of someone you don't trust. Pick and advisor who feels like a partner who will stand beside you through your financial journey. If you do, you'll be on track for a great financial future.If you're ready to start, answer a few questions in SmartAsset's financial advisor selection tool and you'll be contacted by a few advisors in your area to choose from.      Do I Need a Financial Advisor?   Find a Financial Advisor in Your Neighborhood      1 How much house can I afford? 2 How much house can I afford and some more text? 3 How much house can I afford and some more text? 4 How much house can I afford? 5 How much house can I afford? 6 How much house can I afford? 7 How much house can I afford?              Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   7 Mistakes People Make When Choosing a Financial Advisor | SmartAsset.com                                                  Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It      7 Mistakes People Make When Choosing a Financial Advisor Your Details Done By Eric Rosenberg        January 19, 2017  Choosing a financial advisor is a big decision. Unlike hiring a mechanic or hairstylist, financial advisors are usually long term relationships. They are also taking responsibility for your money. With your entire livelihood on the line, choosing the wrong advisor would be a big mistake. Avoid these 7 common blunders when choosing an advisor to ensure you are on track to meet your financial goals.1. Hiring the First Advisor You MeetDepending on where you live, you could have dozens of options for advisors. It is tempting to hire the closest advisor to home. Some people might just pick the first advisor in the yellow pages. This decision requires more time. Take the time to interview at least a few advisors before picking the best match for you.2. Choosing an Advisor with the Wrong SpecialtyAdvisors can have different focus area. Some specialize on retirement planning. Some are best for business owners or those with a high net worth. Others are best for young professionals starting a family. This type of focus does not make an advisor better or worse. It makes them better for certain people than others. Be sure to understand an advisor’s strengths and weaknesses. Do that before signing on the dotted line.3. Picking an Advisor with an Incompatible StrategyEach advisor has a unique strategy. Some advisors may suggest aggressive investments. Others are more conservative. Again, there is no right or wrong. However, there is a right and wrong for you. If you don’t feel comfortable with risk, don’t choose an advisor that prefers aggressive investments. If you prefer to go all in on stocks, an advisor that prefers bonds and index funds is not a great match for your style.4. Skipping Checking ReferencesMost advisors are happy to offer references to prospective clients. If you ask about references and they act nervous, that's a red flag! Quality advisors are happy to discuss past missteps and what they learned. This helps them keep from repeating the same mistake in the future. Calling references only takes a couple of minutes. It can help put you at ease when handing over the keys to your bank account.5. Not Asking about CredentialsTo give investment advice, financial advisors are required to pass a test. Ask your advisor about their licenses, tests, and credentials. This ensures they are qualified to meet your needs. Financial advisors tests include the Series 7 and Series 66 or Series 65. Some advisors go a step further and become a Certified Financial Planner, or CFP. Also ask where they went to school and what degree they earned. Some advisors have a finance degree from a top school. Others could have an English degree from a community college.6. Making Assumptions When They are Affiliated with a Reputable BrandAn advisor might appear qualified and professional due to an association with a major firm like J.P. Morgan or Morgan Stanley. However, that doesn’t make them a great advisor. Working with an advisor from a reputable firm is not a bad idea. It often leads to stability and better tools and information. However, they still have quite a bit of autonomy. Choose an advisor because they are the best fit, not because of their branding.7. Not Understanding How They are PaidThere are different payment models for financial advisors. Some are “fee only.” In this case, they charge a flat rate no matter what. Others charge a percentage of assets under management. Some advisors are paid by mutual funds. This is the worst situation for you. This is a serious conflict of interest. If the advisor earns more by ignoring your best interests, do not hire them.Do Your Research to Find the Perfect AdvisorChoosing a financial advisor is an important decision. It requires the best information available. Gathering information about financial advisors can be tough. That is why SmartAsset created a financial advisor match tool. Answering basic questions results in a list of local advisors to choose from. It doesn't matter if you need help with your finances or just want a second opinion. Find the perfect advisor for your needs today!        Do I Need a Financial Advisor?   Find a Financial Advisor in Your Neighborhood      1 How much house can I afford? 2 How much house can I afford and some more text? 3 How much house can I afford and some more text? 4 How much house can I afford? 5 How much house can I afford? 6 How much house can I afford? 7 How much house can I afford?              Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                   2017's Best Financial Advisors - Find a Financial Advisor Near You | SmartAsset.com                                               Loading          Home Buying  How much house can I afford? Mortgage Calculator Rent vs Buy Mortgage Rates Veterans Home Buying Guide Go To Guide   Refinance  Refinance Calculator Refinance Rates Go To Guide   Credit Cards  Best Credit Cards of 2017 Credit Card Calculator Compare Credit Cards Rewards Credit Card Guide Cash Back Credit Card Guide Balance Transfer Credit Card Guide Zero APR Credit Card Guide Best Cash Back Credit Cards Best Secured Credit Cards Best Balance Transfer Credit Cards What credit card is best for me? Go To Guide   Banking  Checking Accounts Savings Accounts CD Rates Money Market Accounts Go To Guide   Retirement  Retirement Calculator 401(k) Calculator Social Security Calculator Retirement Tax Friendliness Calculator Find a Financial Advisor Go To Guide   Life Insurance  How much life insurance do I need? Life Insurance Quotes Go To Guide   Taxes  Income Tax Calculator Property Taxes Paycheck Calculator Go To Guide   SmartReads More     Student Loans Student Loan Calculator Student Loan Refinance Rates Go To Guide     Personal Loans Personal Loan Calculator Personal Loan Rates Go To Guide     Investing Investment Calculator Asset Allocation Calculator Capital Gains Tax Calculator Online Brokerage Accounts Go To Guide     More Topics Credit Cards Banking Retirement Life Insurance Taxes        SmartAsset.com works best on modern browsers (Internet Explorer 11, Chrome, Safari, Firefox or Opera). Please upgrade your browser to use SmartAsset.com        Search          Tap on the profile icon to edityour financial details.Got It            When would you like to retire?    1-4 years   5-9 years   10-19 years   20-29 years   30+ years   Already Retired           How do you currently manage your money?    I manage my own investments   I use retirement plans (such as a 401(k), Roth IRA, IRA)   I use a robo-advisor   I work with a financial advisor   None of the above          Would you like advice on how to manage income and expenses in retirement?    Yes   Not necessary          Would you like your advisor to perform a complete assessment of your current retirement readiness?    Yes, must have   Nice to have   Not important          How comfortable are you with investing?    I consider myself to be an expert   I'm familiar with financial concepts like ETFs, Options, Annuities but do not consider myself to be an expert   I know the basics of retirement planning   I'm a beginner          Why are you interested in an advisor?    Planning to retire soon   Just married   Recently became a parent   Came into some money   Planning for a major expense   Looking for investment advice   Other           Why are you interested in an advisor?  Other (please explain)           Are you married?    No   Yes           Are you saving jointly or separately?    Separately   Jointly          Do you own your home?    No   Yes           Have you refinanced your home recently to take advantage of low interest rates?    No   Yes          Do you currently have children under 18?    No   Yes, 1   Yes, 2   Yes, 3 or more           Would you like help creating a college savings program for your child?    No   Yes          Do you own a business?    No   Yes          If your investments dropped 10% today, what would you do?    Invest More   Do Nothing   Sell to Cut Losses          How important is it for your financial advisor to have tax expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have estate planning expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          How important is it for your financial advisor to have insurance product expertise?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Is socially responsible investing important to you?    Must have   Nice to have   Not important          Do you currently have a financial advisor?    No   Yes          What is your zipcode?  Zipcode           Does your financial advisor need to be within driving distance of you?    Yes   No, I am comfortable working by phone or video-conference          Please estimate your total investable assets.    Less than $25,000   $25,000 - $99,999   $100,000 - $249,999   $250,000 - $499,999   $500,000 - $999,999   Over $1,000,000          How much are you currently saving on a monthly basis?    Less than $100   $100 - $249   $250 - $499   $500 - $999   $1,000 - $1,999   Over $2,000          We are looking for your match! We're reviewing data from hundreds of certified financial advisors from our vetted and trusted network.  Location Preferences Retirement Timelines Investment Experience Asset Requirements Risk Assessment Advisor Expertise Family Planning Investable Assets       Where should we send information about your advisors?   Email            Great! We've found some fantastic advisors who fit your needs.Who should we have them reach out to?   First and Last Name            The best way to choose an advisor is by actually speaking with them.What phone should they use to reach out to you?   Phone              Thank you!       Show More    Next Steps For You           Thank you!  Invest with         Invest with      Show More    Next Steps For You Get started      Sorry! Something went wrong on our end.Please refresh your browser or come back and try again later.Restart     Why do we need this information?   Thousands of advisors operate in the United States. Your answers power our matching algorithm to select the best 2-4 advisors that meet your needs.Who is SmartAsset?SmartAsset is personal finance, made simple. We read tax codes, so you don't have to. Our personal finance calculators serve more than 3 million users every month.We’ve been featured in publications like:        We only have top-quality financial advisors:   SEC Registered 5-star rated At least 5 years of experience Vetted by reputable third parties    Return to question                   Get in touch Contact Jobs Unsubscribe   SmartAsset About SmartReads Captivate Press   Get Social Like on Facebook Follow on Twitter Add to Google+   Legal Stuff Terms of Service Privacy Policy       Smartly made in NYC  © 2017 SmartAsset, all rights reserved.               OK Cancel      Thanks for visiting SmartAsset! We're now sending you to 's secure website.   Stay on SmartAsset             An error occurred Please reload the page.                



Home - Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)























































Skip to content



Client Login


Search for:



 

Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC (BDF)















 LEARN MORE




Blog

Preparing for Arrival

“Flight attendants prepare for arrival…”  Those were five of the sweetest words I’d ever… Read more

View All Blog Posts
Twitter
Tweets by @BDF_LLC



Why BDF

What. How. And most importantly - Why.
Certainly you should understand what we do and how we do it. But most of all, you should know why.

Read More

Wealth Watch

China’s A Shares an “A” Idea?

On June 20th, index provider MSCI announced big news.  They finally decided to include… Read more

View All Wealth Watch


News

BDF Named to 2017 Financial Times 300 Top Registered Investment Advisers
June 22, 2017 – Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC is pleased to announce it has been named… Read more


Market Turns Upside-Down as Go-Go Tech Stocks Join Slow-Mo Funds
Tech giants are complicating efforts to diversify portfolios. Chad Carlson comments in “Market Turns Upside-Down as Go-Go… Read more


BDF Named One of the Best Places to Work in Illinois for the 7th Year in a Row
Balasa Dinverno Foltz LLC placed 4th in the small business category as one of the 2017 Best Places… Read more

View All News




















 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


